Washington statutes.
RCW 18.122.150

Application of uniform disciplinary act.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, shall govern the issuance and denial of credentials, unauthorized practice, and the discipline of persons credentialed under this chapter. The secretary shall be the disciplining authority under this chapter.

[ 1991 c 3 s 268; 1987 c 150 s 75.]